Hawaii, session 2026, HB2557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that financial literacy is an important skill for all individuals.  The earlier an individual can learn skills such as managing money, understanding credit, and mitigating debt, the better they may set themselves up for a secure future. Further, the Department of Education has recently implemented a financial literacy education requirement for graduation that will take effect in the 2026-2027 academic year. Therefore, there is a need for the University of Hawaii System to create a similar financial education component, which will allow the students to retain the information they learned in high school or practice it in a new way as they take on more financial responsibilities in college. The purpose of this Act is to require the University of Hawaii System to establish a financial literacy program that is offered every semester at no cost to students. SECTION 2.  (a) The university of Hawaii system shall establish a voluntary financial literacy program offered at the beginning of each semester at all campuses to students at no cost.  The program shall include but not be limited to the following: (1)  The true cost of credit; (2)  Choosing and managing a credit card; (3)  Borrowing money for an automobile or other large purchase; (4)  Home mortgages; (5)  Credit scoring and credit reports; (6)  Budgeting; (7)  Tax planning; (8)  Investing; and (9)  Other relevant financial literacy topics. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the implementation of a financial literacy program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________